Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-536
Game birds; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful to use any club, rifle, pistol, revolver, swivel gun, or shotgun larger than ten gauge in hunting any game birds or to trap, snare, net, or attempt to trap, snare, or net any game birds except as otherwise provided in section 37-483. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least fifty dollars.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 256;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 73.